New York, session 2025-2026, A7872.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The real property tax law is amended by adding a new 2 section 467-o to read as follows: 3 § 467-o. Freeze for persons sixty-five years of age or over. 1. Real 4 property owned by one or more persons, each of whom is sixty-five years 5 of age or over, or real property owned by a married couple, a couple in 6 a domestic partnership, or by siblings, one of whom is sixty-five years 7 of age or over, or real property owned by one or more persons, some of 8 whom qualify under this section and the others of whom qualify under 9 section four hundred fifty-nine-c of this title, shall be exempt from 10 payment in lieu of taxes or from taxation by any municipal corporation 11 in which located to the extent beyond the rate which such person was 12 assessed or obligated to pay for the tax year during which such person 13 attained sixty-five years of age. For the purposes of this section, the 14 term "sibling" shall include persons whose relationship as siblings has 15 been established through either half blood, whole blood or adoption. 16 2. Exemption from taxation for school purposes shall not be granted in 17 the case of real property where a child resides if such child attends a 18 public school of elementary or secondary education, unless the governing 19 board of the school district in which the property is located, after 20 public hearing, adopts a resolution providing for such exemption; 21 provided that any such resolution shall condition such exemption upon 22 satisfactory proof that the child was not brought into the residence in 23 whole or in substantial part for the purpose of attending a particular 24 school within the district. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11469-01-5 A. 7872 2 1 3. In order to qualify for an exemption under this section, a person 2 must: 3 (a) be sixty-five years of age or older; 4 (b) own or jointly own a single-family residence or the equivalent of 5 a single-family residence in a multiple dwelling, including multiple-fa- 6 mily homes, apartments, co-operative apartments, and condominiums; and 7 (c) reside in and declare such residence as such person's primary 8 residence for personal income tax purposes for the same year. 9 4. (a) Eligibility or relief under this section shall not be construed 10 as ineligibility for relief for a school tax relief (STAR) exemption 11 pursuant to section four hundred twenty-five of this title, in accord- 12 ance with subdivision two of this section. 13 (b) If, prior to attaining the age of sixty-five, a taxpayer is eligi- 14 ble for other relief under this chapter, once such person reaches the 15 age of sixty-five, the rate of tax assessed pursuant to this section 16 shall be equal to such person's tax obligation the year they attain 17 sixty-five years of age once all granted relief is deducted. 18 (c) Additional real property tax relief for which a taxpayer is eligi- 19 ble may be granted after such person reaches the age of sixty-five. 20 (d) Individuals who have moved their primary residence or who had 21 already attained sixty-five years of age prior to the effective date of 22 this section and meet the eligibility requirements pursuant to subdivi- 23 sion three of this section shall be assessed the real property tax rate 24 for the current taxable year, and such rate shall not increase in 25 accordance with this section. 26 (e) An exemption granted pursuant to this section shall be valid so 27 long as the eligible owner maintains ownership and primary residence of 28 the property. Upon such individual's death or relocation and there is no 29 joint owner privy to the exception, a successive owner shall be subject 30 to a new assessment unless such successive owner or occupant is the 31 spouse, domestic partner, or sibling, as defined in subdivision one of 32 this section, of the exempted owner and is at least sixty-two years of 33 age. 34 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 35 ing the date on which it shall have become a law and shall apply to 36 assessment rolls prepared on the basis of taxable status dates occurring 37 on or after such date.